src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ж_a2
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_ей ;

LEXICON ж_a[2]
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:ей # ;

LEXICON ж_a[2]_Р._мн._затрудн.
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_gPrb ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac+Prb:ей # ;

LEXICON ж_a3
+N+Fem: FSgStem3 ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON ж_a-
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_Prb ;

LEXICON ж_8a
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON соб-ж_8a
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON ж_8a_ь_ья/ьев
+N+Fem:ь FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem:%^Fий аPlStem ;

LEXICON ж_8a_полночь
+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom:по́лночь # ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc:по́лночь # ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen:полу́ночи # ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc:полу́ночи # ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat:полу́ночи # ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins:полу́ночью # ;
+N+Fem:полу́ночь ыPlStem ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_8a]
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON ж_8a_П2
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;
FemLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON ж_8a_[П2]
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;
FemLoc2_inan_Fac ;

LEXICON ж_8a-
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_Prb ;

LEXICON ж_8a-_П2
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_Prb ;
FemLoc2_inan ;

! LEXICON FemLoc2_inan
! +N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc2:%>и́ # ;

! LEXICON FemLoc2_inan_Fac
! +N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc2+Fac:%>и́ # ;

LEXICON ж_b ! This also includes ж_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON соб-ж_b
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON соб-мн._[ж_b]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON соб-ж_b_Р._мн._нет
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlEnd_gPrb ;

LEXICON соб-ж_b-
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlEnd_Prb ;

LEXICON ж_7b_Loc/Dat-и́_Inst-е́й ! лития, паремия
+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Gen:%>ы́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc:%>и́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat:%>и́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins:%>е́й # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю # ;
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON ж_b_GenPlzero ! This also includes ж_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_zero ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_b]
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_b_Р._затрудн.]
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_gPrb ;

LEXICON ж_b_Р._мн._затрудн.
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_gPrb ;

LEXICON ж_b_Р._мн._нет
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_noG ;

LEXICON ж_b- ! This also includes ж_b'- because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_Prb ;

LEXICON соб-ж_b?
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlEnd_gPrb ;

LEXICON ж_8b ! This also includes ж_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FьSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd ;

LEXICON ж_d
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON ж_d_заря
+N+Fem:аря́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:о́ря ыPlStem ;

LEXICON ж_d-
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_Prb ;

LEXICON ж_d' ! Shifting retraction
+N+Fem: FSgRetr ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON ж_e
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON ж_e_GPlь
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom_ь ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_e]
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_e_GPlzero]
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom_zero ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_e]_она
+N+Fem:она ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:она ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́н # ;
+N+Fem:она PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_e]_оса
+N+Fem:оса ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:оса ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́с # ;
+N+Fem:оса PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_8e
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON ж_8e_w/GPlzero
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:%> # ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_8e]
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON ж_8e_церковь
:ь ж_8e ;
+N+Fem: PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_8e_П2
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;
FemLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON ж_8e_П2_дверь
ж_8e_П2 ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins:%>ьми́ # ;

LEXICON ж_8e_[П2]
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;
FemLoc2_inan_Fac ;

LEXICON ж_8e-
+N+Fem: FьSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom_Prb ;

LEXICON ж_8f ! This includes 8f'' (twolc handles InstSg stress)
+N+Fem: FьSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON ж_8f_П2 ! This includes 8f'' (twolc handles InstSg stress)
+N+Fem: FьSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;
FemLoc2_inan ;

LEXICON ж_f
+N+Fem: FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON ж_f_озда
+N+Fem:озда́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:озда́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:озда́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́зд # ;
+N+Fem:озда́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f_ода
+N+Fem:ода́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:ода́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:ода́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́д # ;
+N+Fem:ода́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f_ёза
+N+Fem:еза́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:еза́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:еза́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:ёз # ;
+N+Fem:еза́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f_она
+N+Fem:она́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:она́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:она́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́н # ;
+N+Fem:она́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f_ира
+N+Fem:ира́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:ира́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:ира́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:и́р # ;
+N+Fem:ира́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f_ора
+N+Fem:ора́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:ора́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:ора́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́р # ;
+N+Fem:ора́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f_оса
+N+Fem:оса́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:оса́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:оса́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́с # ;
+N+Fem:оса́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f_простыня
+N+Fem:ыня́ FSgEnd ;
+N+Fem:ыня́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:ыня́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:ыне́й # ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:ы́нь # ;
+N+Fem:ыня́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f' ! Anomolous retraction
+N+Fem: FSgRetr ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON ж_f'_ова
+N+Fem:ова́ FSgRetr ;
+N+Fem:ова́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:ова́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́в # ;
+N+Fem:ова́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f'_ёда
+N+Fem:еда́ FSgRetr ;
+N+Fem:еда́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:еда́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:ёд # ;
+N+Fem:еда́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f'_озда
+N+Fem:озда́ FSgRetr ;
+N+Fem:озда́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:озда́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́зд # ;
+N+Fem:озда́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f'_ода
+N+Fem:ода́ FSgRetr ;
+N+Fem:ода́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:ода́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́д # ;
+N+Fem:ода́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f'_она
+N+Fem:она́ FSgRetr ;
+N+Fem:она́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:она́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́н # ;
+N+Fem:она́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON ж_f'_оса
+N+Fem:оса́ FSgRetr ;
+N+Fem:оса́ ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:оса́ ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́с # ;
+N+Fem:оса́ PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON жо_0
+N+Fem: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Fem: Indecl_Pl_anim ;

LEXICON соб-жо_0
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: Indecl_Pl_anim ;

LEXICON жо_[жо_a]
жо_a ;

LEXICON жо_a
+N+Fem: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мн._[жо_a]
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мн._[жо_a]_3
мн._[жо_a] ;

LEXICON жо_a_GPlь
+N+Fem: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_anim_ь ;

LEXICON жо_a_ица_ицы/ы
+N+Fem:ица FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Fem:ица ыPlStem_anim ;
+N+Fem:а ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON соб-жо_a
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: Vocative ;

LEXICON соб-мн._[жо_a]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON соб-жо_a_MscFac
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: Vocative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: FSgStem_anim_Fac ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlStem_anim_Fac ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: Vocative ;

LEXICON соб-жо_a?
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: ыPlStem_anim_gPrb ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: Vocative ;

LEXICON жо_[жо_a2]
жо_a2 ;

LEXICON жо_a2
+N+Fem: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_anim_ей ;

LEXICON жо_a[2]
+N+Fem: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ей # ;

LEXICON жо_8a
+N+Fem: FьSgStem_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON соб-жо_8a
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: FьSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON жо_b ! This also includes ж_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON соб-жо_b
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON соб-жо_b?
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: ыPlEnd_anim_gPrb ;

LEXICON жо_b_GPlzero ! This also includes ж_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_anim_zero ;
