src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
одеревенелость:одеревене́лость ж_8a ;
общественность:обще́ственность ж_8a "weight: 4.236205046914579" ;
гроздь:гро́зд ж_8a_ь_ья/ьев "weight: 3.353474850572648" ;
полутень:полуте́нь ж_8a_[П2] ;
даль:да́ль ж_8a_П2 "weight: 4.986537301822038" ;
тишь:ти́шь ж_8a_П2 "weight: 3.683189781484801" ;
хрень:хре́нь ж_8a- ;
грусть:гру́сть ж_8a- "weight: 4.258756592723083" ;
пыль:пы́ль ж_8a-_П2 "weight: 4.994949730508928" ;
сень:се́нь ж_8a-_П2 "weight: 4.0507188794475075" ;
нелюбовь:нелюб%^Fо́вь ж_8b "weight: 3.52691970568769" ;
ложь:л%^Fо́жь ж_8b "weight: 4.553152794906837" ;
скатерть:ска́терть ж_8e "weight: 4.373721047225483" ;
плоскость:пло́скость ж_8e "weight: 4.104003500181418" ;
агросеть:а̀гросе́ть ж_8e_[П2] ;
церковь:це́рк%^Fов ж_8e_церковь "weight: 4.883199304056589" ;
дверь:две́рь ж_8e_П2_дверь "weight: 5.840881829953907" ;
ось:о́сь ж_8e_П2 "weight: 4.122371460868339" ;
сажень:са́жень ж_8e_w/GPlzero "weight: 3.5779117282185293" ;
госвласть:госвла́сть ж_8e- ;
глушь:глу́шь ж_8f "weight: 3.9033737220090794" ;
ось:о́сь ж_8f_П2 "weight: 4.122371460868339" ;
пукля:пу́кля ж_a2 ;
плутня:плу́т%^Fеня ж_a2 ;
хрия:хри́я ж_a3 ;
ходуля:ходу́ля ж_a[2] "weight: 3.200861521635764" ;
двойня:дво́й%^Fеня ж_a[2] ;
пакля:па́кля ж_a[2]_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 3.438657665330253" ;
иван-да-марья:ива̀н-да-ма́р%^Fийя ж_a- ;
праща:праща́ ж_b "weight: 3.0859244446606486" ;
хохотня:хохот%^Fёня́ ж_b ;
лития:лити́я́ ж_7b_Loc/Dat-и́_Inst-е́й ;
паремия:пареми́я́ ж_7b_Loc/Dat-и́_Inst-е́й ;
хвала:хва́ла́ ж_b_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 3.62457083534347" ;
казна:ка́зна́ ж_b_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 4.073628808108347" ;
мгла:мгла́ ж_b_Р._мн._нет "weight: 4.171480120595523" ;
тьма:тьма́ ж_b_Р._мн._нет "weight: 4.723009684940834" ;
шестерня:шестер%^Fёня́ ж_b_GenPlzero "weight: 3.0640448756318226" ;
барда:ба́рда́ ж_b- ;
камфара:камфа́ра́ ж_b- "weight: 3.1668087093714035" ;
новина:нови́на́ ж_d ;
скамья:ска́м%^Fе́йя́ ж_d "weight: 4.415294991269072" ;
заря:з ж_d_заря "weight: 4.350566954007783" ; ! мн._зо/ри,_зорь,_зо/рям_//_устар._заря/м_см._также зо/ря
река:ре́ка́ ж_d' "weight: 5.298905138116813" ;
спина:спи́на́ ж_d' "weight: 5.473934370308699" ;
нагота:наго́та́ ж_d- "weight: 3.5421098682728367" ;
лепота:лепо́та́ ж_d- ;
бубна:бу́б%^Fёна ж_e ;
доля:до́ля ж_e "weight: 4.71847511172033" ;
деревня:дере́в%^Fе́ня ж_e_GPlь "weight: 5.260042440696283" ;
борозда:бо́р ж_f_озда "weight: 3.8114595057381995" ;
скорода:ско́р ж_f_ода ;
железа:же́л ж_f_ёза "weight: 4.106045447236205" ;
болона:бо́л ж_f_она ;
борона:бо́р ж_f_она "weight: 3.0640448756318226" ;
просвира:про́св ж_f_ира ;
просфора:про́сф ж_f_ора ;
ноздря:но́здря́ ж_f "weight: 4.3263130592598795" ;
простыня:про́ст ж_f_простыня "weight: 4.437220417480421" ;
голова:го́л ж_f'_ова "weight: 6.064325419692353" ;
середа:се́р ж_f'_ёда "weight: 3.1067543982673835" ;
борозда:бо́р ж_f'_озда "weight: 3.8114595057381995" ;
скорода:ско́р ж_f'_ода ;
рука:ру́ка́ ж_f' "weight: 6.251479736795735" ;
сторона:сто́р ж_f'_она "weight: 5.887330817976565" ;
лесополоса:лѐсопо́л ж_f_оса ;
чау-чау:ча̀у-ча́у жо_0 ;
праматерь:прама́терь жо_8a "weight: 3.353474850572648" ;
гуля:гу́ля жо_[жо_a2] ;
зверина:звери́на жо_[жо_a] ;
правопреемница:пра̀вопрее́мница жо_a ;
боярышня:боя́рыш%^Fеня жо_a_GPlь ; ! Р._мн._боя/рышень
курица:ку́р жо_a_ица_ицы/ы "weight: 4.3623923776409" ;
злыдня:злы́д%^Fеня жо_a2 ;
тётя:тётя жо_a[2] ;
вахня:вах%^Fёня́ жо_b ;
госпожа:госпо́жа́ жо_b_GPlzero "weight: 4.329977805304874" ;
гастроли:гастро́ль мн._[ж_8a] ;
копи:ко́пь мн._[ж_8a] ;
сласти:сла́сть мн._[ж_8e] ;
кости:ко́сть мн._[ж_8e] ;
ножны:нож%^Fёна мн._[ж_b] "weight: 3.889622481901445" ;
мохны:мох%^Fёна мн._[ж_b] ;
бразды:бра́зда́ мн._[ж_b_Р._затрудн.] ;
слюни:слю́ня мн._[ж_e] "weight: 3.683189781484801" ;
бубны:бу́б%^Fёна мн._[ж_e] ;
похороны:по́хор мн._[ж_e]_она "weight: 4.41844853591443" ;
волосы:во́л мн._[ж_e]_оса ;
полдни:по́лд%^Fёня мн._[ж_e_GPlzero] ;
близняшки:близня́ш%^Fека мн._[жо_a] ;
детушки:де́туш%^Fека мн._[жо_a]_3 ;
полночь: ж_8a_полночь "weight: 4.230124240875904" ;
